Washington statutes.
RCW 18.20.520

Stop placement orders and limited stop placement orders.

The department must require an assisted living facility that is subject to a stop placement order or limited stop placement order under RCW 18.20.190 to publicly post in a conspicuous place at the facility a standardized notice that the department has issued a stop placement order or limited stop placement order for the facility. The standardized notice shall be developed by the department to include the date of the stop placement order or limited stop placement order, any conditions placed upon the facility's license, contact information for the department, contact information for the administrator or provider of the assisted living facility, and a statement that anyone may contact the department or the administrator or provider for further information. The notice must remain posted until the department has terminated the stop placement order or limited stop placement order.

[ 2021 c 159 s 2.]

NOTES:

Findings—2021 c 159: "The legislature finds that:

(1) Residents in licensed long-term care facilities have been disproportionately impacted and isolated by the COVID-19 pandemic and over 50 percent of all COVID-19 deaths in Washington have been associated with long-term care facilities;

(2) According to a University of Washington report, social isolation creates a "double pandemic" that disrupts care and exacerbates the difficulties of dementia, depression, suicide risk, chronic health conditions, and other challenges faced by long-term care residents and providers;

(3) A "digital divide" exists in many parts of Washington, particularly for older adults of color with low incomes and those in rural communities;

(4) Residents with sensory limitations, mental illness, intellectual disabilities, dementia, cognitive limitations, traumatic brain injuries, or other disabilities may not be able to fully utilize digital tools which exacerbates their social isolation;

(5) Long-term care facilities already have the legal responsibility to care for their residents in a manner and in an environment that promotes the maintenance or enhancement of each resident's quality of life. A resident should have a safe, clean, comfortable, and homelike environment as detailed in chapter 70.129 RCW; and

(6) The COVID-19 pandemic has exposed systematic weaknesses in the state's long-term care system and there is a need to enact additional measures to protect and improve the health, safety, and quality of life of residents." [ 2021 c 159 s 1.]